Utah statutes.
58-37e-7.   Illegal drug market target community.

A person whose participation in the illegal drug market constitutes the following level offense shall be considered to have the following illegal drug market target community:

(1)  Level 4: the county in which the defendant's place of participation is situated;

(2)  Level 3: the target community described in Subsection (1) plus all counties with a border contiguous to that target community;

(3)  Level 2: the target community described in Subsection (2) plus all counties with a border contiguous to that target community;

(4)  Level 1: the state.



Enacted by Chapter 349, 1997 General Session

